Maryland, session 2026, HB0294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
7–227.
(c) [(1)] Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, personal property is not
subject to valuation or to property tax if:
[(i)] (1) the personal property is owned by an individual and is
used in connection with a business, occupation, or profession that is located at the
individual’s principal residence; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0294*

HOUSE BILL 294
[(ii)] (2) the sum total of the personal property, excluding vehicles
exempt under § 7–230 of this subtitle, had a total original cost of less than $20,000.
[(2) If the individual attests to owning a sum total of personal property with
an original cost of less than $20,000, the Department may not:
(i) collect personal property information from the individual; or
(ii) require the individual to submit a personal property tax return.]
7–245.
[(a)] A person’s personal property is not subject to valuation or to property tax if
all of the person’s personal property statewide had a total original cost of less than $20,000.
[(b) If the person attests to owning a sum total of personal property with an
original cost of less than $20,000, the Department may not:
(1) collect personal property information from the person; or
(2) require the person to submit a personal property tax return.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.